Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Education shall  disburse and expend moneys in a
manner that is consistent with the intended purposes for which the moneys  were appropri-
ated or allocated to the department.
(2) If moneys are appropriated or allocated to the  department and provisions for the in-
tended disbursement or expenditure of the moneys are not provided in statute, in agreement
or by any other means related to the appropriation or allocation, the department may dis-
burse or expend the moneys in the manner the department  determines is most consistent
with the intended purposes  for which the moneys were appropriated or allocated, including
by:
(a) Awarding a grant;
(b) Entering into a contract, intergovernmental agreement or other legal agreement; or
(c) Passing through moneys based on state or federal law or legal agreement.
(3) This section applies to funds received from the federal  government or its agencies,
funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or any other funds  appropriated or allocated
to the department.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 326.051 is amended to read:
326.051. Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305:
(1) In addition to such other duties as are prescribed  by law and pursuant to the requirement
of ORS chapter 183, the State Board of Education shall:
(a) Establish state standards for public kindergartens and public elementary and  secondary
schools consistent with the policies stated in ORS 326.011.
(b) Adopt rules  for the general governance of public kindergartens and public elementary and
secondary schools.
(c) Prescribe required or minimum courses of study.
(d) Adopt rules regarding school and interscholastic activities.
(e) Adopt rules  that provide that no public elementary or secondary school shall discriminate
in determining participation in interscholastic  activities. As used in this paragraph,
“discrimination” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659.850.
Enrolled House Bill 2057 (HB 2057-A) Page 1
(f) Adopt rules  that will eliminate the use and purchase of elemental mercury, mercury com-
pounds and mercury-added instructional materials by public elementary and secondary schools.
(2) The State Board of Education may:
(a) Consistent with the  laws of this state, accept money or property not otherwise provided for
under paragraph (b) of this subsection, which is donated for the use or benefit of the public
kindergartens and public elementary and  secondary schools and use such money or property for the
purpose for  which it was donated. Until it is used, the board shall deposit any money received un-
der this paragraph in a special fund with the State Treasurer as provided in  ORS 293.265 to 293.275.
(b) Apply for federal funds , [ and] accept and enter into any contracts or agreements on behalf
of the state for the receipt of [ such] funds from the federal government  or its agencies  and disburse
or expend the federal funds as provided by section 2 of this 2021 Act. This  paragraph applies
to federal funds to be used  for:
(A) Educational purposes, including but not limited to any  funds available for the school lunch
program;
(B) Career and technical education programs in public elementary and secondary schools; and
(C) Any grants  available to the state or its political subdivisions for general federal aid for
public kindergartens, public elementary schools and public secondary  schools and their auxiliary
services, improvement of teacher preparation, teacher salaries, construction of school buildings, ad-
ministration of the Department of Education and any other educational activities  under the juris-
diction of the State Board of Education.
(c) Adopt rules to administer the United  States Department of Agriculture’s National School
Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program for public  and private prekindergarten through grade
12 schools and residential child care facilities.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2057 (HB 2057-A) Page 2